Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201947-1002
Legislative findings and declarations.

The Legislature finds and declares:

(1) Restraining a pregnant woman can pose undue health risks to the woman and her pregnancy;

(2) The majority of female prisoners and detainees in Nebraska are nonviolent offenders;

(3) Restraining prisoners and detainees increases their potential for physical harm from an accidental trip or fall. The impact of such harm to a pregnant woman can negatively impact her pregnancy;

(4) Freedom from physical restraints is especially critical during labor, delivery, and postpartum recovery after delivery. Women often need to move around during labor and recovery, including moving their legs as part of the birthing process. Restraints on a pregnant woman can interfere with medical staff's ability to appropriately assist in childbirth or to conduct sudden emergency procedures; and

(5) The Federal Bureau of Prisons, the United States Marshals Service, the American Correctional Association, the American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists, the American Medical Association, and the American Public Health Association all oppose or severely limit the routine shackling of women during labor, delivery, and postpartum recovery because it is unnecessary and dangerous to a woman's health and well-being and creates an unnecessary risk to the baby during birth.

Laws 2019, LB690, § 2.
September 1, 2019